Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1096XL (3) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 70A.1, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 7. a. State During the first four years of employment, 3 state employees, excluding state board of regentsâ faculty 4 members with nine-month appointments, and employees covered 5 under a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the 6 public safety bargaining unit who are eligible for accrued 7 vacation benefits and accrued sick leave benefits, who have 8 accumulated ten days of sick leave, and who do not use sick 9 leave during a full month of employment, may elect to have up 10 to one-half day of additional vacation added to the employeeâs 11 accrued vacation account. 12 b. After the fourth year of employment, state employees, 13 excluding state board of regentsâ faculty members with 14 nine-month appointments, and employees covered under a 15 collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the public 16 safety bargaining unit who are eligible for accrued vacation 17 benefits and accrued sick leave benefits, who have accumulated 18 thirty days of sick leave, and who do not use sick leave during 19 a full month of employment , may elect to have up to one-half 20 day of additional vacation added to the employeeâs accrued 21 vacation account. 22 c. The additional vacation time added to an employeeâs 23 accrued vacation account for not using sick leave during a 24 month is in lieu of the accrual of sick leave for that month. 25 The amount of additional vacation for part-time employees shall 26 be prorated to the amount of additional vacation authorized 27 for full-time employees. The director of the department of 28 administrative services may adopt the necessary rules and 29 procedures for the implementation of this program for all state 30 employees except employees of the state board of regents. 31 The state board of regents may adopt necessary rules for the 32 implementation of this program for its employees. 33 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 70A.24 Paid parental leave. 34 1. A state employee entitled to leave under the federal 35 -1- LSB 1096XL (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 shall be provided paid 1 leave for such time as specified in this section for the birth 2 of a child or placement of a child for adoption with the 3 employee if the leave is taken within twelve months following 4 any such birth or adoption. 5 2. a. For the birth of a child, a state employee parent who 6 gave birth shall be entitled to up to four weeks of paid leave 7 and a state employee parent who did not give birth shall be 8 entitled to up to one week of paid leave. 9 b. For the placement of a child for adoption, a state 10 employee parent shall be entitled to up to four weeks of paid 11 leave. 12 3. The department of administrative services shall adopt 13 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this section. 14